Utah statutes.
64-13a-7.   Prison industry properties belong to state.

All money received by prison industries in the administration of this chapter, except as otherwise provided, together with all property acquired, administered, possessed, or received by prison industries are the property of the state, and all expenses, debts, and liabilities incurred by prison industries in connection with the administration of this chapter shall be paid from the Utah Correctional Industries Fund.

